Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 1. In General.
§ 65-1-10.
Powers and duties of Executive Director.

Under the authority of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, and in conformity with its orders as spread on its minutes, the executive director shall:

Unless otherwise provided by law, appoint a director in charge of each operating office of the department who shall be responsible to the Executive Director for the operation of such office. Each such director shall be qualified and experienced in the functions performed by the office under his charge;

Administer the policies promulgated by the commission;

Supervise and direct all administrative and technical activities of the department;

Organize the offices and bureaus of the department;

Coordinate the activities of the various offices of the department;

Fix the compensation of employees of the department and require any employee to give bond to the State of Mississippi for the faithful performance of his duties in an amount the executive director deems appropriate. Premiums on all bonds so required shall be paid out of any funds available to the department;

Recommend such studies and investigations as he may deem appropriate and carry out the approved recommendations in conjunction with the various offices;

Prepare and deliver to the Legislature and the Governor on or before January 1 of each year, and at such other times as may be required by the Legislature or Governor, a full report of the work of the department and the offices thereof, including a detailed statement of expenditures of the department and any recommendations the department may have.

Have full and general supervision over all matters relating to the construction or maintenance of the state highways, letting of contracts therefor, and the selection of materials to be used in the construction of state highways under the authority conferred by this chapter as herein set forth and the employment, promotion, demotion, reprimand, suspension, termination, reassignment, transfer, moving or relocation of all personnel not specifically authorized by statute to be employed by the commission. The executive director may authorize the payment of expenses of any personnel reassigned, transferred, moved or relocated in accordance with such rules and regulations as are promulgated by the commission;

Approve all bids, sign all vouchers and requisitions, issue all orders for supplies and materials, sign all contracts and agreements in the name of the State of Mississippi, and subscribe to all other matters which may arise in the carrying out of the intent and purpose of this chapter;

Receive and assume control, for the benefit of the state, of any and all highways herein or hereafter fixed as roads constituting a part of the state highway system;

Provide for boulevard stops, restricted entrances to main highways and access driveways, neutral grounds, and roadside parks, erect all suitable direction and warning signs, and provide access roads in or to municipalities where necessary; provide limited access facilities when and where deemed necessary, such a facility being defined as a highway or street especially designed or designated for through traffic and over, from or to which owners or occupants of abutting land or other persons have only such limited right or easement of access as may be prescribed by the commission, and provide that certain highways or streets may be parkways from which trucks, buses and other commercial vehicles shall be excluded or may be freeways open to customary forms of highway and street traffic and use, and such limited access facilities or parkways may be planned, designated, established, regulated, vacated, altered, improved, constructed and maintained and rights-of-way therefor specifically obtained, either by purchase, gift, condemnation or other form of acquisition;

Construct bridges with or without footways, and sidewalks where deemed essential to decrease hazards;

Perform services for the Department of Finance and Administration on state property, including, but not limited to, engineering services, and to advance such funds to defray the cost of the expenses incurred in performing such services from out of Transportation Department funds until such department is reimbursed by the Department of Finance and Administration;

Perform all duties authorized by Section 27-19-136, Mississippi Code of 1972, concerning the assessment and collection of permit fees, fines and penalties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 437; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 7; Laws, 1996, ch. 375, § 3, eff from and after October 1, 1996.

§ 65-1-11.
Chief Engineer and other employees.

The executive director, subject to the approval of the commission, shall employ a chief engineer who shall be a registered civil engineer, a graduate of a recognized school of engineering, and who shall have had not less than five (5) years’ actual professional experience in highway construction. The chief engineer shall also be a deputy executive director of the department with such powers and duties as may be prescribed by the commission. The chief engineer shall give bond in the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) in some surety company authorized to do business in this state, which bond shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance and discharge of his duties. The principal and surety on such bond shall be liable thereunder to the State of Mississippi for double the amount of the value of any money or property which the state may lose, if any, by reason of any wrongful or criminal act of such engineer. The term of office of the chief engineer shall be for a period of four (4) years, unless sooner removed as hereinafter provided, and he shall be eligible for reappointment. The first term of office, however, shall extend from the date of appointment until the first Monday of January 1952.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4991; 1942, § 8016; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 3; Laws, 1966, ch. 485, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 8; Laws, 2003, ch. 461, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2003.).

§ 65-1-13.
Deputy executive director for administration.

The commission, upon the recommendation of the executive director, may appoint one (1) deputy executive director for administration in addition to the deputy executive director provided for in Section 65-1-11. The powers and duties of the deputy executive director for administration appointed pursuant to this subsection shall be specified by the commission and shall include, but not be limited to, the execution on behalf of the executive director of contracts approved by the commission and other documents. The appointment of such deputy executive director for administration and the powers specified by the commission must be spread upon the minutes of the commission to become effective.

The commission may issue powers of attorney to individuals as may be recommended by the executive director to execute any documents on behalf of the commission and the executive director as the commission considers appropriate to facilitate the efficient implementation of its duties and responsibilities; however, a power of attorney issued under this subsection shall not authorize the execution of contracts approved by the commission. Powers of attorney issued under this subsection shall specify the limits of the authority to execute documents granted by them. The duration of such powers of attorney shall be for the term of office of the commission that issued them. Such powers of attorney may be revoked by the commission at any time.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 461, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2003.).

§ 65-1-15.
Secretary of the commission.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall employ a secretary whose salary shall be fixed by the commission and shall require the secretary to keep the proper minute books, order books and other proper books. The secretary shall be the custodian of all books, records or other papers of the department. All of such books, records and papers shall be public records and open to inspection by the public during business hours. Each of the commissioners, the Executive Director and the secretary may make certified copies of any proceedings of the department, any of its books or papers, or extracts therefrom. Such copy shall bear the signature of the officer giving it and also the seal of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, and such copies shall be admitted in evidence equally with the originals thereof in all courts of this state. Each of the commissioners and the executive director may take and hear testimony. The seal shall be the coat of arms of the State of Mississippi, surrounded by the words “Mississippi Department of Transportation”. In the event that the original seal should be stolen, lost or misplaced, the commission shall have the power to secure a duplicate seal. The secretary shall be the custodian of the seal and shall do and perform all other things which may be properly required of him by the executive director or commission. He shall give bond in the sum of not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), conditioned as required by law. Except for warrant requisitions drawn in accordance with the provisions of Section 65-1-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, all proceedings of the commission shall be entered upon the minutes of the commission in a minute book to be provided and kept for that purpose, which minutes shall be signed by the chairman or acting chairman of the respective meetings and by the secretary. The pages of the minute book shall be numbered consecutively by the bookmaker. The secretary of the commission shall be an ex officio notary public, authorized to administer oaths and take acknowledgments in the same manner and to the same extent as any other duly appointed, qualified, commissioned and acting notary public, and the seal of the Transportation Department shall be his seal as such ex officio notary public. The bond premium of the secretary shall be paid from any funds available to the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4992; 1942, § 8017; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 4; Laws, 1966, ch. 485, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 65-1-17.
Rental of office space in buildings not owned by the state.

In the event the department needs additional office space which cannot be provided either in state office buildings, or other state-owned buildings, the commission is hereby authorized to rent, on an annual or month-to-month basis on such terms as it may determine to be proper, such office space as may be necessary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3827-12; Laws, 1966, ch. 494, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 65-1-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1981, ch. 464, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

[Codes, 1930, § 5006; 1942, § 8038; Laws, 1930, ch. 47; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 14; Laws, 1949, Ex. Sess. ch. 6, § 11; Laws, 1956, ch. 313; Laws, 1958, ch. 369; Laws, 1964, ch. 452, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch 369 § 15; Laws, 1973, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 317]

§ 65-1-20.
Office of Intermodal Planning.

The Office of Intermodal Planning in the Mississippi Department of Transportation shall have the following responsibilities with respect to all ports in this state that are not state ports:

Study and coordinate efforts designed to promote the development of the navigable waters in the State of Mississippi for water transportation.

Encourage and coordinate the development of river and deep-sea ports and harbor facilities, both new and existing.

Recommend to the proper officials recreational restrictions in critical commercial navigation areas in order to promote public safety and expedite water transportation.

Intercede on behalf of and represent the State of Mississippi in matters pertaining to the application of fees, tolls or user charges levied or contemplated to be levied against the water transportation industry engaged in either intrastate or interstate water commerce.

Receive and use any federal, state or private funds, donations and grants made available for the development, use and expansion of water transportation resources of this state; provided that nothing herein shall be deemed to deny or prohibit any municipal, county, port authority or commission or other governmental or private agency or authority from accepting such donations and grants they are now authorized by law to receive.

Assist all state agencies such as the Department of Economic and Community Development, the Department of Environmental Quality, and others on any matters pertaining to and concerning the water transportation industry.

Compile and provide, where necessary, the capabilities of the Mississippi ports and harbor facilities with respect to equipment, systems or types of products handled, economic benefits, job creation, capital investments, and other pertinent data, including studies and planning for the expansion to further the development of the facilities and the water transportation industry in general.

Provide, where necessary, any and all information and data, both individually and/or collectively, to the Legislature, through the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, for the ports and waterways industry within the state.

Assist in the formation and presentation of any legislation to promote the development and growth of the waterway industry in the State of Mississippi.

No provision of this section shall be construed to give any state agency control over local port commissions or authorities or change any existing laws that such port commissions or authorities presently enjoy to conduct and develop the water transportation industry, and such existing laws shall not be preempted by this section. No provision of this section shall be construed to authorize any diversion from local port commissions or authorities of fees, funds, donations, grants or monies to which such commissions or authorities are otherwise entitled.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 411, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1994).

§ 65-1-21.
District offices.

The permanent district offices for the Office of Highways of the Mississippi Department of Transportation and for the repair and housing of the equipment and vehicles of the department provided for in paragraph (m) of Section 65-1-8, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be at the following locations:

For the Northern District: At or near Batesville and at or near Tupelo.

For the Central District: At or near Yazoo City and at or near Newton.

For the Southern District: At or near McComb and at or near Hattiesburg.

The Northern District Office at or near Tupelo is designated and shall be known as the “Roy Clark Adams District Office.” The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain an appropriate sign or placque designating such office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038.7; Laws, 1950, ch. 389; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 11; Laws, 1995, ch. 347, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 65-1-23.
Testing laboratory, machine shops, etc.

The State Highway Commission is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to erect and construct upon the land hereinafter described a testing laboratory, machine shops, and other necessary buildings, and to expend for such purpose an amount not to exceed Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) out of any funds which may be available for such purpose in the state highway fund.

The State Building Commission is hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to select a suitable tract of land, ten acres in area, from any state-owned lands located in or near the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and not now being used for public purposes. The laboratory shops and other buildings specified in this section shall be erected on the land so selected, which said land is hereby set aside and allocated to the State Highway Commission for the purposes herein specified.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038.5; Laws, 1946, ch. 369; Laws, 1948, ch. 332, § 18.

§ 65-1-25.
Contract for maintenance of connections on highways near state boundaries.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into or ratify agreements with the transportation departments of the adjoining states for the construction or maintenance, or both, of connections on any part of the interstate highway system, state designated highway system or state aid road system at or near the boundaries of the State of Mississippi, the cost of such construction and maintenance to be apportioned between the states according to the benefits to be derived by each of the states as determined by such agreements.

The powers conferred by this section are supplemental to the powers of the commission now provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038.2; Laws, 1958, ch. 374, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 396, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 65-1-27.
Contract for maintenance of connections between interstate and state system highways and county roads or streets.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to enter into or ratify cooperative agreements with the various counties and municipalities in any county through which any of the highways on the interstate highway system, the state designated highway system or the state aid road system may traverse for the construction or maintenance, or both, of connections between such systems and county roads or streets of the municipalities, or interconnections between such systems, the cost of the construction and maintenance of such connections to be apportioned between the Transportation Commission and the county or municipality according to the benefits to be derived by each as determined by such agreement or agreements.

The powers conferred by this section are supplemental to the powers of the commission now provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038.6; Laws, 1958, ch. 375, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 396, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 65-1-29.
Contract with the United States in flood control, drainage, and National Aeronautics and Space Agency projects.

The authority granted the State Highway Commission under provisions of this chapter, shall include the right to enter into agreements with the United States government, or any agency thereof, for the alteration, relocation, reconstruction, or abandonment of state highways or any portion thereof, and conveyance of whatever rights and interests the state owns in property acquired for the purposes of said statutes, or any portion or interest thereof, where the same are necessary for the construction of flood control, navigation, drainage, or National Aeronautics and Space Agency projects approved and adopted by the United States government or any agency thereof.

Upon proper authorization by the State Highway Commission, the director of the State Highway Department is hereby empowered to execute a quitclaim deed selling and conveying the above rights and interests. Said deed shall be delivered to the purchaser upon the payment of the consideration agreed upon, and such consideration shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund.

Such agreements and conveyances shall be upon a consideration deemed reasonable by the State Highway Commission and the agency of the United States government affected, provided that no part of this section is intended to alter or change in any way the existing immunity from certain actions of the state or the United States.

The consideration above shall include the expense of creating and maintaining any necessary detours, and the same shall be created and maintained as provided in the above mentioned agreement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038.3; Laws, 1948, ch. 337, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1950, ch. 424, § 2 (subd. 1); Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 21, eff from and after passage (approved March 2, 1963).

§ 65-1-31.
Certain roads located on levees as temporary state highways.

Whereas, the public convenience requires that certain roads located on levees or within the boundaries of flood control districts created and presently maintained by the federal government, or other governmental authorities, be taken over temporarily by the State Highway Commission, and whereas, the public purpose for which said flood control districts were established requires that such roads be limited to certain widths and restrictions in the public interest, it is the sense of the legislature that the State Highway Commission should be authorized to take over and maintain such roads as temporary state highways, subject to the restrictions imposed by the governmental authorities establishing such flood control districts.

The State Highway Commission, therefore, is hereby authorized to take over and maintain as temporary state highways, for such period and under such terms and conditions as said highway commission may in its discretion prescribe, any road designated by the legislature as a state highway and located on the levee of a flood control district, and in so doing shall not be required to obtain a right of way of more than thirty feet on such type of road, may permit the use of cattle gaps and fencing thereon, and may accept from the federal authorities or other governmental unit having jurisdiction over such flood control district an easement for said road.

The purpose of this section is to enable the state to take over temporarily for maintenance roads designated as state highways located on levees and with less than sixty feet right of way.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038.4; Laws, 1952, ch. 310, §§ 1-3.

§ 65-1-33.
Publicly owned ferries.

The State Highway Commission is hereby authorized to take over, maintain, and operate, as a part of the state highway system under its jurisdiction, any ferry now owned by and operated by, for, or under the authority of any county, county district, or municipality in this state where such ferry is located upon, or is a necessary link of, any designated state highway being maintained by the commission, if such county, county district, or municipality will transfer to said commission all property, real and personal, used by it in the operation of such ferry. In event any such ferries be so taken over by the commission, no toll or fee shall be charged for the use thereof by the public, and all costs of operation and maintenance shall be paid out of the State Highway Maintenance Fund.

Any county, county district, or municipality in this state now owning a ferry which the State Highway Commission may desire to take over under the provisions of this section is hereby authorized to transfer to the State Highway Commission any and all property, real and personal, used by it in the operation of such ferry, without further consideration than the acceptance of the same for public use, pursuant to an order of its governing authority. Any such property so taken over by the commission which may thereafter become unnecessary to the maintenance of traffic over the highway may be disposed of by the commission, in its discretion, and the proceeds paid into the State Highway Maintenance Fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8021-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 301, §§ 1, 2.

§ 65-1-35.
Roads leading to reactivated air bases.

The State Highway Commission is hereby authorized and directed to take over for maintenance and construction, with its own funds, any road formerly maintained as a part of the state highway system leading to an air base, which air base is to be reactivated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8021.9; Laws, 1958, ch. 382.

§ 65-1-37.
Driveways of certain institutions.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to have the Mississippi Department of Transportation construct, repair and maintain the driveways and streets on the grounds of the universities and colleges under the jurisdiction of the Board of Trustees of the State Institutions of Higher Learning, state, and/or county supported junior colleges, the state hospitals, and institutions under the jurisdiction of the Board of Trustees of Mental Institutions, the Board of Trustees of the Columbia Training School and the Oakley Youth Development Center, the Mississippi Schools for the Deaf and Blind, and the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks in the manner provided herein, including bypasses to connect said driveways and streets with roads on the state highway system, and the main thoroughfare running east and west through the grounds of the Mississippi Penitentiary, provided said institutions obtain the necessary rights-of-way, said institutions being hereby authorized so to do.

The Transportation Commission and the governing boards of said institutions shall enter into an agreement prior to undertaking any of the work mentioned in the first paragraph of this section, and said agreement shall be based on the Transportation Department’s furnishing equipment, equipment operators, skilled labor, supervision, and engineering services, and the governing bodies of the aforementioned institutions shall furnish material, supplies and common labor. This agreement shall further provide for reimbursement of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, in full, for the expenditures incurred in the construction, repair and maintenance of driveways and streets at the institutions hereinabove mentioned, such reimbursement to be made directly to the Mississippi Transportation Commission from the institutions. Upon the execution of an agreement as set out herein, the Mississippi Department of Transportation may provide all the necessary engineering, supervision, skilled labor, equipment, and equipment operators to perform such work.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038.9; Laws, 1954, ch. 272, §§ 1-3(¶¶ 1-3); Laws, 1960, ch. 365; Laws, 1975, ch. 341; Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 5; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 129; Laws, 2010, ch. 554, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 65-1-39.
Maintenance of roads on Australia Island.

The State Highway Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to take over, assume jurisdiction of, maintain, repair, and improve the public highways under the jurisdiction of the department of highways of the State of Louisiana on Australia Island, and to enter into such agreements with the department of highways of the State of Louisiana as the said State Highway Commission shall deem necessary, proper, and advisable, provided that the State Highway Commission of Mississippi is reimbursed for the expenditures incurred in the maintenance, repair, and improvement of said roads.

The powers conferred by this section are supplementary to the powers of said commission now provided by law and are not intended in any wise to conflict with the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038.8; Laws, 1955, Ex. Sess. ch. 69, §§ 1, 2.

§ 65-1-41.
Roads serving industrial sites and port areas.

The Mississippi Department of Economic Development is hereby authorized and directed to select and designate certain links of roads or highways to connect any and all approved, acceptable and selected industrial sites that may be located at any point not now accessible to adequate highways and road facilities, and shall issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity to the effect that such designated and selected link of highway or road should be constructed in order to encourage and promote the industrial development of any port or harbor area or other industrial site, and shall immediately file such certificate of public convenience and necessity with the Director of the Mississippi State Highway Commission. However, the Mississippi Department of Economic Development shall not select and designate any such link of road or highway until such time as the department shall have satisfactory evidence that an industry desires and intends to locate on such site, and that the location of such industry and the construction of such road or highway is economically feasible. Construction of any such road shall not begin until the location and construction of such industry is assured and contracts made between the industry and the local authority.

When a certificate of public convenience and necessity has been filed with the Director of the Mississippi State Highway Commission as herein required, the highway commission shall proceed to locate, survey and have constructed such link or highway or public road in such quality and standards as may be found to adequately serve such proposed industry.

The Mississippi Department of Economic Development shall not select or designate any link of public road or highway more than ten (10) miles long to connect any industrial site, harbor or port facility with any existing public road or highway, nor shall such board designate or select any link or links of road in an excess of a total of two hundred (200) miles of highways or public roads.

Any highway or public road selected, designated and constructed under the provisions of this section shall be constructed from the highway fund within which highway district such highway or road has been selected, designated and constructed.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to alter, change or amend any other statutes of the State of Mississippi designating highways, state-aid roads or other public roads, and any limitations placed upon the total miles of such highways, state-aid roads, or public roads shall not be affected by the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8021.8; Laws, 1957, Ex. Sess. ch. 16, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1989, ch. 524, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 65-1-43.
Costs and feasibility surveys for toll highways and bridges to offshore islands.

When it is deemed feasible and advisable to promote the tourist industry of the State of Mississippi by providing more attractions as would be available in development of offshore islands, the Mississippi State Highway Commission is authorized to make costs and feasibility surveys for toll highways and bridges to offshore islands.

The Mississippi Highway Commission is authorized to employ expert engineering and economic assistance for such surveys when it is deemed advisable by the commission. The State Highway Commission is limited to a maximum amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this section.

In the event that any bonds are issued as a result of the feasibility surveys authorized under the provisions of this section, the State Highway Commission shall be reimbursed for all of the expenditures authorized herein, and said expenditures shall be paid from the first proceeds of any bond issue herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8038-11; Laws, 1962, ch. 441, §§ 1-4.

§ 65-1-44.
Instruction course for weight and tax enforcement personnel.

Agents and employees of the Mississippi Department of Transportation who are charged with the enforcement of the weight laws and the motor vehicle privilege tax laws of this state pursuant to Sections 63-5-43 and 27-19-137, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall, as soon as practicable after being appointed enforcement personnel, and in order to continue serving as such, successfully complete a course of instruction at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Training Academy, which course shall be established by an agreement between the Mississippi Department of Transportation and the Commissioner of Public Safety pursuant to Section 45-5-7, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 65-1-45.
Weight limitation on highways and bridges.

The State Highway Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to restrict or prohibit the use of any state highway or bridge or to reduce the allowable weight permitted on any state highway or bridge when, due to any special weather or other hazard, such highways or bridges have been weakened or when such highways have substandard surfacing or weak bridges due to any cause. Likewise, the board of supervisors of any county shall have the same regulatory powers as granted the highway department in this section. It shall be the duty of the State Highway Commission and the boards of supervisors of the counties to post sufficient warning on any highway or bridge restricted in any manner, so that such restriction may be understood by the operator of any vehicle. Any person who shall operate a vehicle on any highway, road, or bridge when such highway, road, or bridge is under restriction, in violation of such restriction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished in accordance with the provisions of section 63-9-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, providing for the punishment of misdemeanors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8271; Laws, 1958, ch. 501; Laws, 1960, ch. 409; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 22; Laws, 1964, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 33, eff from and after passage (approved July 15, 1964).

§ 65-1-46.
Appeals Board; appeal of penalty for excess weight; judicial review.

There is created an Appeals Board of the Mississippi Transportation Commission. If any person feels aggrieved by a penalty for excess weight assessed against him by an agent or employee of the Mississippi Department of Transportation pursuant to Section 27-19-89, he may apply to the Appeals Board.

The members serving on the Appeals Board on April 7, 1995, shall continue to serve until July 1, 1995. On July 1, 1995, the Appeals Board shall be reconstituted to be composed of five (5) qualified people. The initial appointments to the reconstituted board shall be made no later than June 30, 1995, for terms to begin July 1, 1995, as follows: One (1) member shall be appointed by the Governor for a term ending on June 30, 1996, one (1) member shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor for a term ending on June 30, 1997, one (1) member shall be appointed by the Attorney General for a term ending on June 30, 1998, one (1) member shall be appointed by the Chairman of the State Tax Commission for a term ending on June 30, 1999, and one (1) member shall be appointed by the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation for a term ending on June 30, 2000. After the expiration of the initial terms of the members of the reconstituted board, all subsequent appointments shall be made for terms of four (4) years from the expiration date of the previous term. Any member serving on the Appeals Board before July 1, 1995, may be reappointed to the reconstituted appeals board. Appointments to the board shall be with the advice and consent of the Senate; however, the advice and consent of the Senate shall not be required for the appointment of a person to the reconstituted appeals board for a term beginning on July 1, 1995, if such person was serving as a member of the Appeals Board on June 30, 1995, and such person received the advice and consent of the Senate for that appointment.

There shall be a chairman and vice chairman of the board who shall be elected by and from the membership of the board. Any member who fails to attend three (3) consecutive regular meetings of the board shall be subject to removal by a majority vote of the board. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum. The chairman, or a majority of the members of the board, may call meetings as may be required for the proper discharge of the board’s duties. Members of the board, except a member who is an officer or employee of the Mississippi Department of Transportation, shall receive per diem in the amount authorized by Section 25-3-69, for each day spent in the actual discharge of their duties and shall be reimbursed for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-3-41.

Application shall be made by petition in writing, within thirty (30) days after assessment of the penalty, for a hearing and a review of the amount of the assessment. At the hearing the Appeals Board shall try the issues presented according to the law and the facts and within guidelines set by the Transportation Commission. Upon due consideration of all the facts relating to the assessment of the penalty, the appeals board, except as otherwise provided under this section or under Section 27-19-89, may require payment of the full amount of the assessment, may reduce the amount of the assessment or may dismiss imposition of the penalty entirely. The Appeals Board shall dismiss in its entirety the imposition of any penalty imposed against the holder of a harvest permit if the permittee proves to the Appeals Board, by clear and convincing evidence, that the average load transported by the permittee during the permittee’s last five (5) haul days immediately preceding the day upon which the penalty appealed from was assessed did not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds. The Appeals Board shall reduce the penalty assessed against the holder of a harvest permit to a maximum of Two Cents (2¢) per pound of overweight if the permittee proves to the Appeals Board, by clear and convincing evidence, that the average load transported by the permittee during the permittee’s last five (5) haul days immediately preceding the day upon which the penalty appealed from was assessed exceeded seventy-nine thousand nine hundred ninety-nine (79,999) pounds but did not exceed eighty-four thousand (84,000) pounds. The board shall make such orders in the matter as appear to it just and lawful and shall furnish copies thereof to the petitioner. If the Appeals Board orders the payment of the penalty, the petitioner shall pay the penalty, damages and interest, if any, within ten (10) days after the order is issued unless there is an application for appeal from the decision of the board as provided in the succeeding paragraph. Interest shall accrue on the penalty at the rate of one percent (1%) per month, or part of a month, beginning immediately after the expiration of the ten-day period.

If any person feels aggrieved by the decision of the Appeals Board, he may appeal the decision to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 23; Laws, 1994, ch. 501, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 589, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1995).